Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4729.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SPECIAL LIQUOR LAW; CITY OF ERHARD.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any other law, ordinance, or charter provision to the contrary, the city of Erhard may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license to the Erhard Community Park, located in the city at Pelican River Avenue. The provisions of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 340A, not inconsistent with this section, apply to a license issued under this section. The city of Erhard is deemed the licensee under this section, and the provisions of Minnesota Statutes, sections 340A.603 and 340A.604, apply to the license as if the facility was a municipal liquor store. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the Erhard City Council and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021. new text end